New York, session 2025-2026, S4160.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 623 of the correction law is REPEALED and a new 2 section 623 is added to read as follows: 3 § 623. Communication with people confined to correctional facilities. 4 1. State agencies charged with the operation and management of state 5 prisons and youth residential placements or detention centers shall 6 provide persons in their custody and confined in a correctional or 7 detention facility with voice communication service. Such state agencies 8 may supplement voice communication service with other communication 9 services, including, but not limited to, video communication and elec- 10 tronic mail or messaging services. To the extent that such voice commu- 11 nication service or any other communication service is provided, which 12 shall not be limited beyond program participation and routine facility 13 procedures, each such service shall be provided free of charge to the 14 person initiating and the person receiving the communication. 15 2. No state agency shall receive revenue from the provision of voice 16 communication services or any other communication services to any person 17 confined in a state correctional facility or youth residential placement 18 or detention center. 19 3. State agencies charged with the operation and management of state 20 prisons and youth residential placements or detention centers shall 21 maintain in-person visits for persons in their custody and confined in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04335-01-5 S. 4160 2 1 their facilities. Communications services shall not be used to replace 2 any in-person visit program. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2026 and shall apply to any 4 new or renewal contract for voice communication services for incarcerat- 5 ed individuals or other advanced communication services entered into on 6 or after such date and provided further that any new or renewal contract 7 for voice communication services for incarcerated individuals or other 8 advanced communication services entered into prior to April 1, 2026 9 shall not run past March 31, 2026.